Vermont, session 2025-2026, H770.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code creates a new federal
program to subsidize scholarships for expenses at public and private schools.
(2) Under the terms of the statute, states may voluntarily elect to
participate in the program, or they may decline to participate.
VT LEG #385542 v.5

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.770
2026 Page 2 of 2
(3) The decision concerning whether or not to participate in the program
is to be made by “the Governor of the State or by such other individual,
agency, or entity as is designated under State law to make such elections on
behalf of the State with respect to Federal tax benefits.”
Sec. 2. 2 V.S.A. § 24 is added to read:
§ 24. DESIGNATED ENTITY; PARTICIPATION IN FEDERAL TAX
CREDIT PROGRAM
(a) In accordance with 26 U.S.C. § 25F(g)(1)(B), the General Assembly
designates itself as the sole entity to make an election under 26 U.S.C. § 25F.
(b) Vermont shall not participate in the federal tax credit program for
contributions to scholarship granting organizations under 26 U.S.C. § 25F.
(c) Any election to the contrary made by another State official or entity is
void and shall have no effect.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385542 v.5